Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.855

Examination reports and information—Exempt from public disclosure—Use in civil actions.

(1) Examination reports and information obtained by the director or the director's representatives in conducting examinations pursuant to RCW 21.20.700 shall not be subject to public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

(2) In any civil action in which the reports are sought to be discovered or used as evidence, any party may, upon notice to the director, petition the court for an in camera review of the report. The court may permit discovery and introduction of only those portions of the report which are relevant and otherwise unobtainable by the requesting party. This subsection shall not apply to an action brought or defended by the director.

[ 2005 c 274 s 238; 1988 c 244 s 16.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—Implementation—Application—1988 c 244: See notes following RCW 21.20.700.